src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-puuola_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pūola: # Noun 45 'eng /est põlv/fin' - full paradigm
     pūola+N+Sg+Nom: pūola
     pūola+N+Sg+Gen: pūola
     pūola+N+Sg+Par: pȯllõ
     pūola+N+Sg+Dat: pūolan
     pūola+N+Sg+Ins: pūolaks
     pūola+N+Sg+Ill: pȯllõ
     pūola+N+Sg+Ela: pūolast
     pūola+N+Pl+Nom: pūolad
     pūola+N+Pl+Gen: pūolad
     pūola+N+Pl+Par: pūolidi
     pūola+N+Pl+Dat: pūoladõn
     pūola+N+Pl+Ins: pūoladõks
     pūola+N+Pl+Ill: pūoliž
     pūola+N+Pl+Ela: pūolist
